Hawaii, session 2026, GM1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that schools, health care
settings, libraries, shelters, places of worship, and other
community spaces must remain safe and accessible to all
residents. In January 2025, the United States Department of
Homeland Security rescinded prior guidance protecting
"sensitive" or "protected" areas, authorizing unrestricted
immigration enforcement in these locations. The legislature
further finds that these changes have created uncertainty and
chilled access to critical services. The legislature
additionally finds that these locations must continue to
function as trusted, safe spaces where people can go without
fear and that state and county agencies that operate these
locations should adopt policies limiting collaboration with
federal authorities for immigration enforcement purposes.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) By January 1, 2027, require all state and county
agencies that operate protected community locations to
2026-3287 HB1870 GDI HMSO
iiiMiiiiiigiiiniiiHini

Page 2
H.B. NO.
■. . I ’I . g
C.D. 1
adopt and post written policies that identify
nonpublic areas, establish procedures for warrant
verification and staff response, prohibit the
collection of certain iininigration-status data, and
require annual staff training and certain multilingual
notices; and
(2) Require the attorney general to publish model
policies.
SECTION 2. (a) By January 1, 2027, all state and county
agencies that operate protected community locations shall adopt
and post written policies that:
(1) Identify nonpublic areas;
(2) Establish procedures for warrant verification and
staff response;
(3) Prohibit the collection of immigration-status data
unless required by law;
(4) Require annual staff training; and
(5) Require multilingual notices stating that services are
provided regardless of immigration status.
(b) The attorney general shall publish model policies for
adoption by all state and county agencies that operate protected
2026-3287 HB1870 CDl HMSO 2
IIIIIIIIIDIIillilllilH

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
community locations and voluntary adoption by private education
or health providers and private places of worship.
(c) For the purposes of this section:
"Nonpublic area" means any area of a facility that is not
open to the general public.
"Protected community location" means any facility operated
by the State or a county.
SECTION 3. This Act is of statewide concern, in accordance
with article X, section 6 of the Hawaii State Constitution.
Nothing in this Act restricts the university of Hawaii from
complying with mandatory federal contractor certifications or
other conditions tied to federal funding.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3287 HB1870 CDl HMSO 3
iiiiiiiiiiHiiiiiiniiiiiiii

H.B. NO 1870
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1870, HD 2, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1870, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
186-26